West Virginia, session 2026, HB5045.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. SCHOOL PERSONNEL. §18A-2-13. Recommended guidelines for full-day and half-day cooks. The following guidelines are optional guidelines mandatory that county boards may shall use when scheduling full-day and half-day cooks:Number of	Number of	Average Number ofMeals	Cooks	Meals Served Per		Cook's Hours Worked1-90 1-110	1	12.00 14.6791-135 111-166	1.5	12.00 14.67136-180 167-222	2	12.00 14.67181-225 223-278	2.5	12.00 14.67226-270 279-334	3	12.00 14.67271-315 335-390	3.5	12.00 14.67316-360 391-446	4	12.00 14.67361-405 447-558	4.5	12.00 14.67406-450 559-614	5	12.00 14.67451-495 615-670	5.5	12.00 14.67496-540 671-726	6	12.00 14.67541-585 727-782	6.5	12.00 14.67586-630 783-838	7	12.00 14.67631-675 839-894	7.5	12.00 14.67676-720 895-950	8	12.00 14.67721-765 951-1006	8.5	12.00 14.67766-810 1007-1062	9	12.00 14.67811-855 1063-1118	9.5	12.00 14.67856-900 1119-1194	10	12.00 14.67A meal prepared for a school lunch shall be established as a whole meal. Other meals shall be equal to three fourths of a school lunch meal.Beginning with the school year 2027-2028, the minimum ratio of school cooks shall be one cook for every 110 meals prepared and served.